src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON TACONJ_4  !!= * @CODE@ TS
!< "+V":0 "+TA":0 0:ê 0:w "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@"   >     # ; !Baseform
+V+TA: TACONJ-CONTTS ;

LEXICON TACONJ_5 ! This is just guessing, I do not know how the VTA-5 vers are inflected.
!< "+V":w "+TA":0   "@U.perspref.NULL@" "@U.tense.Prs@" "@U.mood.indep@"   >     # ; !Baseform
+V+TA:w TACONJ-CONT ;

LEXICON TACONJ-CONT
< "+Ind":0 "@U.mood.indep@" > TA_IND ; !
< "+Cnj":0 "@U.mood.cnj@" > TA_CNJ ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > TA_FUT ; !
< "+Imp":0 "@U.mood.imp@" > TA_IMP ; !

LEXICON TACONJ-CONTTS
< "+Ind":0 "@U.mood.indep@" > TA_INDTS ; !
< "+Cnj":0 "@U.mood.cnj@" > TA_CNJTS ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > TA_FUT ; !
< "+Imp":0 "@U.mood.imp@" > TATS_IMP ; !

LEXICON TACONJ-CONTVw
< "+Ind":0 "@U.mood.indep@" > TA_INDVw ;
< "+Cnj":0 "@U.mood.cnj@" > TA_CNJVw ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > TAVw_FUT ; !
< "+Imp":0 "@U.mood.imp@" > TAVw_IMP ; !

LEXICON TACONJ-CONTCw
< "+Ind":0 "@U.mood.indep@" > TA_INDCw ; !
< "+Cnj":0 "@U.mood.cnj@" > TA_CNJCw ; !
< "+Fut":0 "+Cond":0 "@U.mood.FutCon@" > TACw_FUT ; !
< "+Imp":0 "@U.mood.imp@" > TACw_IMP ; !



LEXICON TA_IND !!= @CODE@ gives prs
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":0          > TA_IND_PERSPREF ;!
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":0          > TA_IND_PERSPREF ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":0 > TA_IND_PERSPREF ; !Future definite 
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 > TA_IND_PERSPREF ; !Future intentional

LEXICON TA_INDTS !!= @CODE@ gives prs
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":0          > TA_INDTS_PERSPREF ;!
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":0          > TA_INDTS_PERSPREF ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":0 > TA_INDTS_PERSPREF ; !Future definite 
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 > TA_INDTS_PERSPREF ; !Future intentional

LEXICON TA_INDVw !!= @CODE@ gives prs
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":0          > TA_INDVw_PERSPREF ;!
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":0          > TA_INDVw_PERSPREF ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":0 > TA_INDVw_PERSPREF ; !Future definite 
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 > TA_INDVw_PERSPREF ; !Future intentional

LEXICON TA_INDCw !!= @CODE@ gives prs
< "@U.tense.Prs@"    "+Prs":0          > TA_INDCw_PERSPREF ;!
< "@U.tense.Prt@"    "+Prt":0          > TA_INDCw_PERSPREF ; !
< "@U.tense.FutDef@" "+Fut":0 "+Def":0 > TA_INDCw_PERSPREF ; !Future definite 
< "@U.tense.FutInt@" "+Fut":0 "+Int":0 > TA_INDCw_PERSPREF ; !Future intentional

LEXICON TA_IND_PERSPREF !!= @CODE@ gives tags for subject, flag for object, and directs to obj suffs
@U.perspref.NI@   VTA_NI_O ;  !
@U.perspref.KI@   VTA_KI_O ;  !
@U.perspref.NULL@ VTA_NULL_O ;  !

LEXICON TA_INDTS_PERSPREF !!= @CODE@ gives tags for subject, flag for object, and directs to obj suffs
@U.perspref.NI@   VTA_NI_O ;  !
@U.perspref.KI@   VTATS_KI_O ;  !
@U.perspref.NULL@ VTATS_NULL_O ;  !

LEXICON TA_INDVw_PERSPREF !!= @CODE@ gives tags for subject, flag for object, and directs to obj suffs
@U.perspref.NI@   VTAVw_NI_O ;  !
@U.perspref.KI@   VTAVw_KI_O ;  !
@U.perspref.NULL@ VTAVw_NULL_O ;  !

LEXICON TA_INDCw_PERSPREF !!= @CODE@ gives tags for subject, flag for object, and directs to obj suffs
@U.perspref.NI@   VTACw_NI_O ;  !
@U.perspref.KI@   VTACw_KI_O ;  !
@U.perspref.NULL@ VTACw_NULL_O ;  !



LEXICON VTA_NI_O  !!= @CODE@ gives the objects suffixes matching 1Sg subject or 1Sg object
+1Sg+3SgO:%>âw		  # ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>âwak	  # ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>ik        # ;
!+3Sg+1PlO:%>ik        # ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>ikonân	  # ;
+3Pl+1SgO:%>ikwak	  # ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>ânân	  # ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>ânânak	  # ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>ikonânak  # ;


LEXICON VTA_KI_O 	    !!= @CODE@ gives the objects suffixes matching 2Sg subject
+2Sg+3SgO:%>âw		  # ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>âwak	  # ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>ik		  # ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>ikwak	  # ;
+12Pl+3SgO:%>ânaw	  # ;
+12Pl+3PlO:%>ânawak	  # ;
+3Sg+12PlO:%>ikonaw	  # ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>ikowâw	  # ;
+3Pl+12PlO:%>ikonawak # ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âwâw	  # ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âwâwak	  # ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>ikowâwak  # ;
+2Sg+1SgO:%>in         # ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân       # ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>inân       # ;
+2Pl+1SgO:%>inâwâw     # ;
+1Sg+2SgO:%>itin         # ;
+1Pl+2SgO:%>itinân         # ; !OBS
+1Sg+2PlO:%>itinâwâw         # ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>itinân         # ;

				  
LEXICON VTA_NULL_O 	  
+3Sg+3SgO:%>êw		  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3SgO:%>ik		  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3SgO:%>kow	  # ; ! Oki 77
+3Sg+3PlO:%>êw		  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3PlO:%>ikowak	  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3PlO:%>ikak	  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Pl+3SgO:%>kow	  # ; ! Oki 77
+3Pl+3SgO:%>êwak	  # ; ! Oki 77
+4Sg+4PlO:%>êyiwa	  # ;

+4Sg+3SgO:%>ik	  # ; !OBS
+5Sg+3SgO:%>ikoyiwa  # ; 
+4Sg+3PlO:%>ikwak	  # ; !OBS
+5Sg+4SgO:%>ikoyiwa  # ; !??
+4Sg+4SgO:%>êyiwa  # ; !

!+3Pl+3PlO:%>ikowak	  # ; ??
+3Pl+3PlO:%>êwak	  # ;
+4Pl+3SgO:%>êyiwa	  # ;
+4Pl+3PlO:%>êyiwa	  # ;

LEXICON VTATS_KI_O 	    !!= @CODE@ gives the objects suffixes matching 2Sg subject
+2Sg+3SgO:%>âw		  # ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>âwak	  # ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>ik		  # ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>ikwak	  # ;
+12Pl+3SgO:%>ânaw	  # ;
+12Pl+3PlO:%>ânawak	  # ;
+3Sg+12PlO:%>ikonaw	  # ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>ikowâw	  # ;
+3Pl+12PlO:%>ikonawak # ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âwâw	  # ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âwâwak	  # ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>ikowâwak  # ;
+2Sg+1SgO:%>%^TSin         # ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>%^TSinân       # ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>%^TSinân       # ;
+2Pl+1SgO:%>%^TSinâwâw     # ;
+1Sg+2SgO:%>itin         # ;
+1Pl+2SgO:%>itinân         # ; !OBS
+1Sg+2PlO:%>itinâwâw         # ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>itinân         # ;

				  
LEXICON VTATS_NULL_O 	  
+3Sg+3SgO:%>êw		  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3SgO:%>ik		  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3SgO:%>kow	  # ; ! Oki 77
+3Sg+3PlO:%>êw		  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3PlO:%>ikowak	  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3PlO:%>ikak	  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Pl+3SgO:%>kow	  # ; ! Oki 77
+3Pl+3SgO:%>êwak	  # ; ! Oki 77
+4Sg+4PlO:%>êyiwa	  # ;

+4Sg+3SgO:%>ik	  # ; !OBS
+5Sg+3SgO:%>ikoyiwa  # ; 
+4Sg+3PlO:%>ikwak	  # ; !OBS
+5Sg+4SgO:%>ikoyiwa  # ; !??
+4Sg+4SgO:%>êyiwa  # ; !

!+3Pl+3PlO:%>ikowak	  # ; ??
+3Pl+3PlO:%>êwak	  # ;
+4Pl+3SgO:%>êyiwa	  # ;
+4Pl+3PlO:%>êyiwa	  # ;

LEXICON VTAVw_NI_O  !!= @CODE@ gives the objects suffixes matching 1Sg subject or 1Sg object
+1Sg+3SgO:%>âw		  # ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>âwak	  # ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>%^WIik        # ;
!+3Sg+1PlO:%>%^WIik        # ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>%^WIikonân	  # ;
+3Pl+1SgO:%>%^WIikwak	  # ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>ânân	  # ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>ânânak	  # ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>%^WIikonânak  # ;


LEXICON VTAVw_KI_O 	    !!= @CODE@ gives the objects suffixes matching 2Sg subject
+2Sg+3SgO:%>âw		  # ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>âwak	  # ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>%^WIik		  # ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>%^WIikwak	  # ;
+12Pl+3SgO:%>ânaw	  # ;
+12Pl+3PlO:%>ânawak	  # ;
+3Sg+12PlO:%>%^WIikonaw	  # ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>%^WIikowâw	  # ;
+3Pl+12PlO:%>%^WIikonawak # ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âwâw	  # ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âwâwak	  # ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>%^WIikowâwak  # ;
+2Sg+1SgO:%>%in         # ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân       # ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>inân       # ;
+2Pl+1SgO:%>inâwâw     # ;
+1Sg+2SgO:%>%^WIitin         # ;
+1Pl+2SgO:%>%^WIitinân         # ; !OBS
+1Sg+2PlO:%>%^WIitinâwâw         # ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>%^WIitinân         # ;

				  
LEXICON VTAVw_NULL_O 	  
+3Sg+3SgO:%>êw		  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3SgO:%>ik		  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3SgO:%>kow	  # ; ! Oki 77
+3Sg+3PlO:%>êw		  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3PlO:%>ikowak	  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Sg+3PlO:%>ikak	  # ; ! Oki 77
!+3Pl+3SgO:%>kow	  # ; ! Oki 77
+3Pl+3SgO:%>êwak	  # ; ! Oki 77
+4Sg+4PlO:%>êyiwa	  # ;

+4Sg+3SgO:%>%^WIik	  # ; !OBS
+5Sg+3SgO:%>%^WIikoyiwa  # ; 
+4Sg+3PlO:%>%^WIikwak	  # ; !OBS
+5Sg+4SgO:%>%^WIikoyiwa  # ; !??
+4Sg+4SgO:%>êyiwa  # ; !

!+3Pl+3PlO:%>%^WIikowak	  # ; ??
+3Pl+3PlO:%>êwak	  # ;
+4Pl+3SgO:%>êyiwa	  # ;
+4Pl+3PlO:%>êyiwa	  # ;

LEXICON VTACw_NI_O  !!= @CODE@ gives the objects suffixes matching 1Sg subject or 1Sg object
+1Sg+3SgO:%>âw		  # ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>âwak	  # ;
+3Sg+1SgO:%>%^IOik        # ;
!+3Sg+1PlO:%>%^IOik        # ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>%^IOikonân	  # ;
+3Pl+1SgO:%>%^IOikwak	  # ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>ânân	  # ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>ânânak	  # ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>%^IOikonânak  # ;
