src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBSTEMS !!= @CODE@ here come all the verbstems \\
asahpitêw:asahpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he ties s.o. together into a bunch, bundle" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
atoskâtêw:atoskât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he works at or on s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
âniskohpitêw:âniskohpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he ties s.o. end to end, s/he lengthens s.o. (i.e. by tying on an extra length)" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
cikahkwâtêw:cikahkwât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he throws a dart at s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
cîstipitêw:cîstipit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he scratches s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
itahpitêw:itahpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he ties s.o. so" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kaskikwâtêw:kaskikwât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he sews s.o. (e.g. pants); s/he sews for s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kêcitâsêpitêw:kêcitâsêpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he pulls s.o.'s pants off" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kipwahpitêw:kipwahpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he ties s.o. closed in (in a sack)" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kînikokotêw:kînikokot3 TACONJ_4 "s/he whittles s.o. to a point" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kîskâyowêpitêw:kîskâyowêpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he pulls s.o.'s tail off" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kîwêtowâtêw:kîwêtowât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he returns with s.o. on his/her own back" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
kwêskipitêw:kwêskipit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he pulls s.o. the other way" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
mâhcikwahpitêw:mâhcikwahpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he ties s.o. down (so that one cannot move)" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
mêskanâhkâtêw:mêskanâhkât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he builds a road for s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
miswâkanikâtêw:miswâkanikât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he wounds s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
môhkotêw:môhkot3 TACONJ_4 "s/he planes s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
nakâpitêw:nakâpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he pulls s.o. to a stop" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
nawaswâtêw:nawaswât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he chases after s.o., s/he pursues s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
nâwayôhpitêw:nâwayôhpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he ties s.o. in a sequence" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
nîhtaciwêpitêw:nîhtaciwêpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he pulls s.o. downhill" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
ohcinatêw:ohcinat3 TACONJ_4 "s/he fights s.o. over something; s/he fights s.o. on account of something" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
otâpâtêw:otâpât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he drags s.o.; s/he serves as draft animal; s/he gives s.o. a ride in a sled, s/he pulls s.o. in a sled; s/he pulls s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
pahkwêsâwâtêw:pahkwêsâwât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he slices s.o. off, s/he cuts a piece off s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
paspinatêw:paspinat3 TACONJ_4 "s/he almost causes s.o.'s death, s/he barely misses s.o. (by shooting, in a car, etc.)" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
pêkopitêw:pêkopit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he pulls s.o. awake" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ not found in wC; see also pîkopitêw
piskihcikwâtêw:piskihcikwât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he sews an extension on s.o. (e.g. pants)" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
pîkiskwâtêw:pîkiskwât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he speaks to s.o., s/he talks to s.o.; s/he speaks about s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
poscipitêw:poscipit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he pulls s.o. on (e.g. pants)" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-0’ 
sakikwêpitêw:sakikwêpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he grabs s.o. by the neck" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
sêwêpitêw:sêwêpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he jingles s.o., s/he rings s.o. (e.g. a bell)" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
sîhtahpitêw:sîhtahpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he ties s.o. tightly" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
tahkiskâtêw:tahkiskât3 TACONJ_4 "s/he kicks s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
tasopitêw:tasopit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he opens s.o. up (with a knife)" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
tâtopitêw:tâtopit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he rips s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
waniskâpitêw:waniskâpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he pulls s.o. up from lying; s/he pulls s.o. up to a sitting position" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
wâkikotêw:wâkikot3 TACONJ_4 "s/he cuts s.o. curved, s/he hews s.o. curved" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
wêwêpitêw:wêwêpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he swings s.o., s/he rocks s.o. (e.g. in a rocker)" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
wîhkwaciskiwêpitêw:wîhkwaciskiwêpit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he pulls s.o. free from a bog or mud" ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
yâyikipitêw:yâyikipit3 TACONJ_4 "s/he tears s.o." ; ! VTA-4 Independent, 3s-3’ 
